Arkansas, session 2025, HB1874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(5), concerning professional
development funding under the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is amended
to read as follows:
(5)(A) For each school year, professional development funding
shall be equal to an amount of up to forty-one dollars ($41.00) multiplied by
the school district's previous school year average daily membership.
(B) Funding for professional development for teachers in
Arkansas public schools required under the Teacher Excellence and Support
*TNL316*
03/20/2025 12:47:04 PM TNL316

HB1874
System, § 6-17-2801 et seq., other law or rule, or by the school district
shall be used for professional development activities and materials that:
(i) Improve the knowledge, skills, and effectiveness
of teachers;
(ii) Address the knowledge and skills of
administrators and paraprofessionals concerning effective instructional
strategies, methods, and skills;
(iii) Lead to improved student academic achievement;
and
(iv) Provide training for school bus drivers as
outlined in rules promulgated by the Commission for Arkansas Public School
Academic Facilities and Transportation.
(C)(i) For the 2023-2024 school year and each school year
thereafter, additional funding up to sixteen million five hundred thousand
dollars ($16,500,000) provided for professional development Funding provided
above the maximum amount in subdivision (b)(5)(A) of this section shall be
used by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education for the
development and administration of professional learning communities for the
benefit of public school districts implementation of the LEARNS Act to
improve student academic outcomes.
(ii)(a) The division may distribute funds under
subdivision (b)(5)(C)(i) of this section through grants to eligible entities.
(iii) The Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education shall may promulgate rules to administer the additional
professional development funding under subdivision (b)(5)(C)(i) (b)(5)(C) of
this section.
(b) The Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education may partner with or choose a person, firm, corporation, or
education service cooperative to provide the knowledge, skills, experience,
and expertise for the development of a research-based process for the
implementation of professional learning communities.





03/20/2025 12:47:04 PM TNL316